Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-312
Lottery by the sale of pickle cards, defined.

Lottery by the sale of pickle cards shall mean any gambling scheme in which participants pay or agree to pay something of value for a pickle card. Any lottery by the sale of pickle cards shall be conducted pursuant to and in accordance with the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act.

Lottery by the sale of pickle cards shall not mean or include any activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, except as provided in section 9-346, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, nor shall lottery by the sale of pickle cards mean or include any activity prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 78;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 658, § 1.

Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.